Alabama, session 2026rs, HB408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act is adopted pursuant to the
authority in subdivision (31) of Section 104 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022.
Section 2. (a) The Alabaster City Council, by
ordinance, may provide for the establishment of not more than
two entertainment districts in the city, as those districts
are defined in the Alabaster City Code. The entertainment
districts may contain one or more Alabama Alcoholic Beverage
Control Board licensees in an area that does not exceed
one-half mile by one-half mile. The ordinance of the city
council shall regulate hours of operation of an entertainment
district, may provide for the revocation of the entertainment
district designation, and may regulate any other aspect of the
operation of entertainment districts.
(b) Any retail licensee of the Alabama Alcoholic
Beverage Control Board licensed to sell alcoholic beverages
for on-premises consumption located in an entertainment
district may obtain an entertainment district permit.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any licensee that
receives an entertainment district permit shall comply with
Page 1

receives an entertainment district permit shall comply with
HB408 Enrolled
all laws and rules governing its license, except that patrons,
guests, or members of the licensee may exit the licensed
premises with open containers of alcoholic beverages anywhere
within the confines of the entertainment district but may not
enter the premises of another licensee with open containers or
closed containers of alcoholic beverages acquired elsewhere.
In addition, the ordinance shall prohibit a person other than
a retail licensee from possessing or bringing into the
entertainment district an open or closed container of
alcoholic beverages acquired outside of the entertainment
district during the hours of operation of the entertainment
district.
(c) The ordinance shall be enforced by the City of
Alabaster and shall provide penalties for violations of the
ordinance as otherwise authorized by law.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB408 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 24-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3